Wisconsin, session 2025, SB377.
do enact as follows:SB377,13Section 1. 84.02 (5) (d) 2. r. of the statutes is created to read:SB377,1,5484.02 (5) (d) 2. r. The Brooklyn Area Veterans Memorial in the town of 5Brooklyn in Green County.SB377,21Section 2. Initial applicability.SB377,2,32(1) This act first applies to highway maps published after the effective date of 3this subsection.SB377,2,44